Ohio, session 136, SB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 2901.44 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 2901.44. (A) The task force on missing women and 7
girls who are Black, Indigenous, or People of Color is created. 8
The task force shall do all of the following: 9
(1) Work with state agencies to develop policy changes 10
that will address the lack of care and concern for missing and 11
murdered women and girls who are Black, Indigenous, or People of 12
Color and identify policies that will ensure that first 13
responders are culturally competent; 14
(2) Advance the knowledge of communities on the severity 15
of the issue of women and girls who are Black, Indigenous, or 16
People of Color who are missing and murdered; 17
(3) Ensure that communities of people who are Black, 18
Indigenous, or People of Color are educated and trained on 19

S. B. No. 178 Page 2
As Introduced
prevention and protection strategies and social media protocols 20
regarding women and girls who are Black, Indigenous, or People 21
of Color who are missing and murdered; 22
(4) Develop a strategy to collect statistics, 23
demographics, surveys, oral histories, and data analysis 24
relevant to women and girls who are Black, Indigenous, or People 25
of Color who are missing and murdered; 26
(5) Recommend preventive programming and ideas to advance 27
the safety of women and girls, including policies that address 28
the overlapping forms of oppression faced by women and girls who 29
are Black, Indigenous, or People of Color; 30
(6) Identify major traffic hubs, highways, and resource 31
extraction sites that lead to or are responsible for the 32
facilitation of the abduction of women and girls who are Black, 33
Indigenous, or People of Color; 34
(7) Create a statewide awareness campaign regarding women 35
and girls who are Black, Indigenous, or People of Color who are 36
missing and murdered; 37
(8) Hold public meetings throughout the state to solicit 38
public input; 39
(9) Solicit and accept written public input. 40
(B) The task force shall consist of the following members: 41
(1) The director of job and family services or the 42
director's designee; 43
(2) The executive director of the division of criminal 44
justice services or the executive director's designee; 45
(3) The superintendent of the state highway patrol or the 46

S. B. No. 178 Page 3
As Introduced
superintendent's designee; 47
(4) Two members appointed by the president of the senate; 48
(5) Two members appointed by the speaker of the house of 49
representatives; 50
(6) One member appointed by the minority leader of the 51
senate; 52
(7) One member appointed by the minority leader of the 53
house of representatives. 54
(B) Task force members appointed under divisions (B)(4) to 55
(7) of this section shall be representative of the communities 56
experiencing this crisis, including directly impacted 57
individuals, and reflect the diversity of the state and have 58
experience in cultural competency. 59
(C) Initial members of the task force shall be appointed 60
not later than ninety days after the effective date of this 61
section. Members of the task force appointed under divisions (B) 62
(4) to (7) of this section shall serve terms of two years. Any 63
vacancy on the task force shall be filled in the same manner as 64
the original appointment. 65
(D) Members shall select a chairperson from among the 66
members of the task force. 67
(E) A majority of the members of the task force 68
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of the business of the 69
task force. 70
(F) Task force members shall serve without compensation 71
but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses 72
incurred in the performance of their duties. 73

S. B. No. 178 Page 4
As Introduced
(G) Not later than two years after the effective date of 74
this section, and every two years thereafter, the task force 75
shall submit a report containing its findings and 76
recommendations to the president of the senate, speaker of the 77
house of representatives, minority leader of the senate, and 78
minority leader of the house of representatives. The report 79
shall be made available to the public. 80
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 81
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 82
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 83
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 84
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 85
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 86
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 87
Section 3. 88
89
1 2 3 4 5
A AGO ATTORNEY GENERAL
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 055321 Operating Expenses $250,000 $250,000
D General Revenue Fund Total $250,000 $250,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $250,000 $250,000
TASK FORCE ON MISSING WOMEN AND GIRLS WHO ARE BLACK, 90
INDIGENOUS, OR PEOPLE OF COLOR 91
The foregoing appropriation item 055321, Operating 92
Expenses, shall be used to support expenses related to the Task 93

S. B. No. 178 Page 5
As Introduced
Force on Missing Women and Girls Who Are Black, Indigenous, or 94
People of Color, created by section 2901.44 of the Revised Code. 95
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 96
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 97
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 98
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 99
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 100
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 101
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 102
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 103
of the 136th General Assembly. 104